California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) No long-term health care facility participating as a provider under the Medi-Cal program shall seek to evict out of the facility or, effective January 1, 2002, transfer within the facility, any resident as a result of the resident changing his or her manner of purchasing the services from private payment or Medicare to Medi-Cal, except that a facility may transfer a resident from a private room to a semiprivate room if the resident changes to Medi-Cal payment status. This section also applies to residents who have made a timely and
 good faith application for Medi-Cal benefits and for whom an eligibility determination has not yet been made.

(b) This section does not apply to any resident of a skilled nursing facility or intermediate care facility, receiving respite care services, as defined in Section 1418.1 of the Health and Safety Code, unless it is already being provided through a Medicaid waiver program pursuant to Section 1396n of Title 42 of the United States Code, or is already allowed as a covered service by the Medi-Cal program.

(c) Nothing in this section shall limit a facility’s ability to transfer a resident within a facility, as provided by law, because of a change in a resident’s health care needs or if the bed retention would result in there being no available Medicare-designated beds within a facility.

(d) This section shall be
 implemented only to the extent it does not conflict with federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 451, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.10.

(a) No licensed long-term health care facility participating as a provider under the Medi-Cal program shall discriminate against a Medi-Cal patient on the basis of the source of payment for the facility’s services that are required to be provided to individuals entitled to services under the Medi-Cal program. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a facility from charging private-pay patients for services required to be provided to Medi-Cal patients or which are in addition to those required under the Medi-Cal program.

(b) (1) A long-term health care facility participating as a provider under the Medi-Cal program shall provide aid, care, service, and other benefits available under Medi-Cal to Medi-Cal beneficiaries in the
 same manner, by the same methods, and at the same scope, level, and quality as provided to the general public, regardless of payment source. This subdivision applies to, but is not limited to, admission practices, room selection and placements except as specified in subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 14124.7, and meal provision.

(2) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that this subdivision does not constitute a change in law and policy, but is declaratory of existing law and the Medi-Cal Provider Agreement and therefore the requirements imposed by this subdivision shall not be considered a new state mandate for the purposes of reimbursement pursuant to Article 3.8 (commencing with Section 14126) of this chapter or any other Medi-Cal ratesetting provisions of any law, regulation, or the California Medicaid State Plan.

(3) In the event of a final judicial determination made
 by any state or federal court that is not appealed, or by a court of appellate jurisdiction that is not further appealed, in any action by any party or a final determination by the administrator of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, that reimbursement by the Medi-Cal program to long-term health care facilities for costs associated with this section is required by state or federal law or regulation, this subdivision shall become operative only upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(c) Nothing in this section shall limit a facility’s ability to provide aid, care, service, and other benefits available under Medi-Cal in the manner, method, scope, and level appropriate based upon resident acuity and health care needs.

(d) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that it does not conflict with federal law and that any necessary federal approvals are obtained
 and federal financial participation for the Medi-Cal program is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 339, Sec. 4.   (SB 1354)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.11.

(a) The department shall establish a two-year pilot program to utilize the federal Public Assistance Reporting Information System (PARIS) to identify veterans and their dependents or survivors who are enrolled in the Medi-Cal program and assist them in obtaining federal veteran health care benefits.

(b) The department shall select three consenting counties that have in operation a United States Department of Veterans Affairs (USDVA) medical center to participate in the pilot program.

(c) Under the pilot program, the department shall exchange information with PARIS and identify veterans and their dependents or survivors who are receiving Medi-Cal benefits in the pilot program counties.

(d) The department shall refer identified Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are receiving high-cost services, including long-term care, to county veteran service officers (CVSOs) to obtain information regarding, and assistance in obtaining, USDVA benefits.

(e) Prior to commencement of the pilot program, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Enter into an agreement with the California Department of Veterans Affairs (CDVA) to perform CVSO outreach services in connection with the pilot program. The CDVA agreement shall contain performance standards that would allow the department to measure the effectiveness of the pilot program.

(2) Enter into any agreements that are required by the federal government to utilize the PARIS system.

(3) Perform any information technology activities that are necessary to utilize the PARIS system.

(f) If the department determines that the pilot program is cost effective, it may implement the program statewide at any time and continue operation of PARIS indefinitely.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific, this section by means of written directives without taking further regulatory action.

(h) The department shall implement the pilot program by July 1, 2009.

(i) In order to achieve maximum cost savings the Legislature hereby determines that an expedited contract process for contracts under this section is necessary. Therefore, contracts under this section shall be exempt from the Public Contract Code and from Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 11250) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 60.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.12.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, for the duration of the COVID-19 emergency period, the department shall implement any federal Medicaid program waiver or flexibility approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services related to the COVID-19 public health emergency. This includes, but is not limited to, any waiver or flexibility approved pursuant to Sections 1315, 1320b-5, or 1396n of Title 42 of the United States Code, or the Medi-Cal state plan. Any request for a federal Medicaid program waiver or flexibility shall be subject to Department of Finance approval before the department submits that request to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(2) During the COVID-19 emergency period, and through
 December 31, 2022, for any extended waiver or flexibility described in subdivision (f), if there is a conflict between this chapter, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), Chapter 8.8 (commencing with Section 14600), or Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700), and any approved federal waiver or flexibility, as described in paragraph (1), the approved federal waiver or flexibility shall control over any conflict in the specified state law.

(b) (1) To the extent that federal financial participation is available, the department, subject to Department of Finance approval, shall exercise its option under Section 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XXIII) of Title 42 of the United States Code to extend the medical assistance, as described in Section 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XVIII) of Title 42 of the United States Code, to uninsured individuals, as defined in Section 1396a(ss) of Title 42 of the United States Code, for the duration of the
 COVID-19 emergency period.

(2) The department, subject to Department of Finance approval, may seek federal approval pursuant to Section 1315 of Title 42 of the United States Code to extend the medical assistance afforded to uninsured individuals pursuant to paragraph (1) to include COVID-19-related treatment services that are otherwise covered for full-scope Medi-Cal beneficiaries, as defined by the department. If federal financial participation is unavailable, the department, subject to Department of Finance approval, may elect to implement this paragraph on a state-only funding basis, and subject to an appropriation by the Legislature.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall seek to maximize federal financial participation for Medi-Cal expenditures that it determines to be available for the COVID-19 public health emergency, and shall comply with any federal
 requirements and conditions for receipt of that federal financial participation. This includes, but is not limited to, the temporary increase in the federal medical assistance percentage made available pursuant to Section 6008 of the federal Families First Coronavirus Response Act (Public Law 116-127).

(d) Due to the impact of the COVID-19 public health emergency on the department’s ongoing administration of the Medi-Cal program, the department may seek any federal approvals it deems necessary for any number of temporary extensions of all or select components of the California Medi-Cal 2020 Demonstration (No. 11-W-00193/9) pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 14184), which is scheduled to expire on December 31, 2020. If the department elects to seek any extension, the department shall determine the length of time for the extension sought and whether to seek an extension for the entirety of the demonstration or select components of
 the demonstration. In implementing this subdivision, the department, to the extent practicable, shall consult with affected stakeholder entities before seeking a temporary extension.

(e) The department, subject to Department of Finance approval, shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement this section or to maintain sufficient access to covered benefits under the Medi-Cal program during the COVID-19 emergency period. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(f) (1) (A) The department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to extend the approved waiver or flexibility implemented pursuant to subdivision (a), as of July 1, 2021, that are related to the delivery and
 reimbursement of services via telehealth modalities in the Medi-Cal program. Subject to subdivision (e), the department shall implement those extended waivers or flexibilities for which federal approval is obtained, to commence on the first calendar day immediately following the last calendar day of the federal COVID-19 public health emergency period, and through December 31, 2022.

(B) Subject to subdivision (e), the department may authorize the use of remote patient monitoring as an allowable telehealth modality for covered health care services and provider types it deems appropriate for dates of service on or after July 1, 2021. The department may establish a fee schedule for applicable health care services delivered via remote patient monitoring.

(2) (A) For purposes of informing the 2022–23 proposed Governor’s Budget, released in January 2022, the
 department shall convene an advisory group consisting of consultants, subject matter experts, and other affected stakeholders to provide recommendations to inform the department in establishing and adopting billing and utilization management protocols for telehealth modalities to increase access and equity and reduce disparities in the Medi-Cal program. The advisory group shall analyze the impact of telehealth in increased access for patients, changes in health quality outcomes and utilization, best practices for the appropriate mix of in-person visits and telehealth, and the benefits or liabilities of any practice or care model changes that have resulted from telephonic visits.

(B) The advisory group shall include representatives of the California Medical Association, the California Primary Care Association, the California Association of Public Hospitals, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association, Medi-Cal managed care plans, Planned
 Parenthood Affiliates of California, Essential Access Health, and other subject matter experts or other affected stakeholders as identified by the department.

(3) For purposes of implementing this subdivision, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this paragraph shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(4) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to limit coverage of, and reimbursement for, telehealth
 modalities that are the type authorized by the department prior to the COVID-19 emergency period and described in the Medi-Cal State Plan, the Medi-Cal provider manual, or other departmental guidance.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, subject to appropriation by the Legislature and Section 11.95 of the Budget Act of 2021, the department shall implement those activities and expenditures to enhance, expand, or strengthen home and community-based services (HCBS) under the Medi-Cal program that are approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services pursuant to Section 9817 of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2) and associated federal guidance.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall comply with any federal requirements and conditions as necessary to claim the increased federal medical assistance
 percentage for eligible HCBS expenditures pursuant to Section 9817 of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2) and associated federal guidance.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, stipends or payments received by an individual from initiatives included in the approved HCBS spending plan described in this subdivision shall not be considered income or resources for purposes of determining the individual’s, or any member of their household’s, eligibility for benefits or assistance, or the amount or extent of benefits or assistance, under any state or local benefit or assistance program, to the extent permitted under federal law and, where applicable, to the extent any necessary federal approvals are obtained.

(4) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, the State
 Department of Social Services, the California Department of Aging, the State Department of Public Health, the State Department of Developmental Services, the State Department of Rehabilitation, and the Department of Health Care Access and Information, as applicable, may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision and any HCBS activity described in paragraph (1) by means of all-county letters, plan letters, provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(5) For purposes of implementing this subdivision and any HCBS activity described in paragraph (1), the department, the State Department of Social Services, the California Department of Aging, the State Department of Public Health, the State Department of Developmental Services, the State Department of Rehabilitation, and the Department of Health Care Access and Information, as applicable, may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive
 contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this paragraph, and the implementation of any HCBS activity described in paragraph (1), shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, Chapters 7 (commencing with Section 9530) and 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540) of Division 8.5 of this code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(6) Any funding made available to the Traumatic Brain Injury Program in the State Department of Rehabilitation pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be exempted from subdivision (b) of Section 4355, subdivision (b) of Section 4357, and subdivision (c) of Section
 4357.1.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, subject to subdivision (e), the department shall align COVID-19 vaccine administration payments to payment reimbursement structures for vaccines administered in accordance with the Medi-Cal State Plan.

(i) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking any further regulatory action.

(j) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “COVID-19 emergency period” has the same meaning as “emergency period” as defined in Section 1320b-5(g)(1)(B)
 of Title 42 of the United States Code, unless otherwise defined in federal law or any federal approval obtained pursuant to this section.

(2) “COVID-19 public health emergency” means the Public Health Emergency declared by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services on January 31, 2020, pursuant to Section 247d of Title 42 of the United States Code, and entitled “Determination that a Public Health Emergency Exists Nationwide as the Result of the 2019 Novel Coronavirus,” including any subsequent renewal of that declaration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 62.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.13.

(a) The department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis for purpose of administering or implementing any federal grant awarded pursuant to the federal 21st Century Cures Act (Public Law 114-255), any subsequent amendments to that federal act, or any associated federal regulation or policy guidance.

(b) Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of
 the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 52, Sec. 29.   (SB 97)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.14.

(a) The department shall develop and submit an application to solicit a grant authorized under Section 9007 of the federal 21st Century Cures Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 290bb-37) to develop a community-based crisis response plan. To the extent consistent with federal grant application requirements, the grant application shall include, at a minimum, a plan for all of the following:

(1) Promoting integration and coordination between local public and private entities engaged in crisis response, including first responders, emergency health care providers, primary care providers, law enforcement, court systems, health care payers, social service providers, and behavioral
 health providers.

(2) Developing memoranda of understanding with public and private entities to implement crisis response services.

(3) Addressing gaps in community resources for crisis intervention and prevention.

(4) Developing models for minimizing hospital emergency department utilization and readmissions, including through appropriate discharge planning.

(b) The department shall confer with stakeholders during the development of the grant application. Stakeholders shall include, but not be limited to, representatives from organizations that have experience responding to crisis care, including hospitals, first responders, emergency health care providers,
 primary care providers, law enforcement, court systems, health care payers, social service providers, behavioral health providers, and organizations representing consumers of behavioral health services and their significant support persons.

(c) If the department receives a grant under Section 9007 of the federal 21st Century Cures Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 290bb-37), the department shall submit to the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services, at the time and in the manner, and containing the information, as the secretary may reasonably require, a report, including an evaluation of the effect of the grant on all of the following:

(1) Local crisis response services and measures for individuals receiving crisis planning and early intervention supports.

(2) Individuals reporting improved functional outcomes.

(3) Individuals receiving regular followup care following a crisis.

(d) The department shall submit a copy of the report described in subdivision (c) to the Legislature. A report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) This section shall become operative only if Congress appropriates funds for purposes of Section 9007 of the federal 21st Century Cures Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 290bb-37).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 315, Sec. 1.   (AB 2112)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.15.

(a) Effective January 1, 2023, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, the department shall design and implement a supplemental payment program for emergency medical air transportation services to increase the Medi-Cal reimbursement in an amount not to exceed normal and customary charges charged by qualified emergency medical air transportation providers.

(b) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, and any applicable federal waivers and state plan amendments by means of plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions
 without taking any further regulatory action.

(c) In implementing this section, the department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(d) This section shall become inoperative if any of the following occurs: 

(1) The federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services denies approval for the implementation of this section.

(2) The Legislature fails to appropriate moneys for the program in the annual Budget Act, or fails to appropriate such moneys in a separate bill enacted within 30 days following enactment of the annual Budget Act.

(3) A lawsuit related to this section is filed against the state and a preliminary injunction or other order has been issued that results in a financial disadvantage to the state, including, but not limited to, a loss of federal financial participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 476, Sec. 3.   (AB 1104)   Effective October 4, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.16.

(a) (1) Upon appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose, the department shall complete an independent analysis to determine whether network adequacy exists to obtain federal approval for a covered Medi-Cal benefit that provides housing support services. The analysis shall take into consideration all of the following in assessing capacity to provide a covered housing support services benefit:

(A) Providers that are not certified Medi-Cal providers, but are receiving funding from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development to provide housing support services.

(B) The number of providers in relation to each region’s or county’s
 number of people experiencing homelessness.

(C) A comparison of provider networks in states that have implemented Medicaid benefits to fund housing support services, including any similar Medicaid benefits in California serving different populations.

(D) Specific actions the department could take to develop a network of providers meeting the criteria of this section, and an estimated timeline for developing an adequate network, should the analysis conclude that the state’s network is not yet adequate.

(2) The department shall report, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, the outcomes of the independent analysis to the Legislature by January 1, 2024, so long as an appropriation is made as described in paragraph (1).

(b) For purposes of
 implementing this section, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 263, Sec. 2.   (SB 171)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.2. Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program [14124.20. - 14124.29.]

14124.20.

(a) The department may enter into a Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program contract with each county for the provision of alcohol and drug use services within the county service area.

(b) A county that has multiple contracts with the department for the provision of multiple alcohol and drug use services may enter into a single contract with the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 36, Sec. 80.   (SB 1014)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.21.

(a) If a county decides to not enter a Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program contract with the department, the county shall notify the department of this decision in writing by the May 20 preceding the fiscal year in which, or at least 60 days before, the contract would have become effective.

(b) (1) To the extent that a county decides not to enter into or
 terminates its Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program contract with the department, the department shall contract for Drug Medi-Cal Treatment services in the county as necessary to ensure beneficiary access to these services. The contract shall be made in accordance with federal Medicaid and state Medi-Cal laws and in accordance with the federal court order and any future action in the case of Sobky v. Smoley (E.D.Cal 1994) 855 F.Supp. 1123.

(2) The department may enter into contracts for the provision of Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program services with certified Drug Medi-Cal providers directly or through qualifying individual counties, counties acting jointly, county consortia, and with qualified individuals, organizations, or nongovernmental entities.

(c) The department and the Department of Finance shall determine how much funding is necessary to provide the necessary services in a
 county and notify the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 36, Sec. 80.   (SB 1014)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.22.

(a) In addition to narcotic treatment program services, a narcotic treatment program provider who is also enrolled as a Medi-Cal provider may provide medically necessary medical treatment of concurrent health conditions within the scope of the provider’s practice, to Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are not enrolled in managed care plans. Medi-Cal beneficiaries enrolled in managed care plans shall be referred to those plans for receipt of
 medically necessary medical treatment of concurrent health conditions.

(b) Diagnosis and treatment of concurrent health conditions of Medi-Cal beneficiaries not enrolled in managed care plans by a narcotic treatment program provider may be provided within the Medi-Cal coverage limits. When the services are not part of the substance use disorder treatment reimbursed pursuant to Section 14021.51, services shall be reimbursed in accordance with the Medi-Cal program. Services reimbursable under this section shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Medical treatment visits.

(2) Diagnostic blood, urine, and X-rays.

(3) Psychological and psychiatric tests and services.

(4) Quantitative blood and urine toxicology assays.

(5) Medical supplies.

(c) A narcotic treatment provider, who is enrolled as a Medi-Cal fee-for-service provider, shall not seek reimbursement from a beneficiary for substance abuse treatment services, if services for treatment of concurrent health conditions are billed to the Medi-Cal fee-for-service program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 36, Sec. 80.   (SB 1014)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.23.

The department may enter into contracts for the procurement of services to assist the department in administering the Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 36, Sec. 80.   (SB 1014)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.24.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “Drug Medi-Cal reimbursable services” means the substance use disorder services described in the California Medicaid State Plan and includes, but is not limited to, all of the following services, administered by the department, and to the extent consistent with state and federal law:

(1) Narcotic treatment program services, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 14021.51.

(2) Intensive outpatient treatment services.

(3) Perinatal residential services for pregnant women and women in the postpartum period.

(4) Naltrexone services.

(5) Outpatient drug-free services.

(6) Other services upon approval of a federal Medicaid state plan amendment or waiver authorizing federal financial participation.

(b) (1) While seeking federal approval for any federal Medicaid state plan amendment or waiver associated with Drug Medi-Cal services, the department shall consult with the counties and stakeholders in the development of the state plan amendment or waiver.

(2) Upon federal approval of a federal Medicaid state plan amendment authorizing federal financial participation for the following
 services, and subject to appropriation of funds, “Drug Medi-Cal reimbursable services” shall also include the following services, administered by the department, and to the extent consistent with state and federal law:

(A) Medication-assisted treatment services, including both of the following:

(i) Any medication approved under Section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 355), and all biological products licensed under Section 351 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 262) to treat opioid use disorders.

(ii) Counseling services and behavioral therapy.

(B) Case management services, including supportive services to
 assist a person with substance use disorder diagnoses in gaining access to medical, social, educational, and other needed services.

(C) Aftercare services.

(c) (1) The nonfederal share for Drug Medi-Cal services shall be funded through a county’s Behavioral Health Subaccount of the Support Services Account of the Local Revenue Fund 2011, and any available county funds eligible under federal law for federal Medicaid reimbursement. The funds contained in each county’s Behavioral Health Subaccount of the Support Services Account of the Local Revenue Fund 2011 shall be considered state funds distributed by the principal state agency for the receipt of the federal block grant funds for prevention and treatment of substance abuse found at Subchapter XVII of Chapter 6A of
 Title 42 of the United States Code. Pursuant to applicable federal Medicaid law and regulations, including Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, a county may claim allowable Medicaid federal financial participation for Drug Medi-Cal services based on the county’s certification of their actual total funds expenditures for eligible Drug Medi-Cal services to the department.

(2) (A) If the director determines that a county’s provision of Drug Medi-Cal treatment services are disallowed by the federal government or by state or federal audit or review, the impacted county shall be responsible for repayment of all disallowed federal funds. In addition to any other recovery methods available, including, but not limited to, offset of Medicaid federal financial participation funds owed to the
 impacted county, the director may offset these amounts in accordance with Section 12419.5 of the Government Code.

(B) A county subject to an action by the director pursuant to subparagraph (A) may challenge that action by requesting a hearing in writing no later than 30 days from receipt of notice of the department’s action. The proceeding shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have the powers granted therein. Upon a county’s timely request for hearing, the county’s obligation to make payment as determined by the director shall be stayed pending the county’s exhaustion of administrative remedies provided but no longer than necessary to ensure the department’s compliance with Section 1903(d)(2)(C) of the federal
 Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396b).

(d) Drug Medi-Cal services are only reimbursable to a Drug Medi-Cal provider with an approved Drug Medi-Cal contract.

(e) A county shall negotiate contracts only with providers certified to provide Drug Medi-Cal services.

(f) The department shall develop methods to ensure timely payment of Drug Medi-Cal claims.

(g) (1) A county or a contracted provider, except for a provider subject to the requirements of subdivision (h), shall submit accurate and complete cost reports for the previous fiscal year by November 1, following the end of the fiscal year. The department may settle Drug Medi-Cal
 reimbursable services, based on the cost report as the final amendment to the approved county Drug Medi-Cal contract.

(2) Any amount paid for any service provided to a Drug Medi-Cal beneficiary shall be audited by the department in the manner and form described in Section 14170.

(3) Administrative appeals to review grievances or complaints arising from the findings of an audit or examination made pursuant to this section shall be subject to Section 14171.

(h) A certified narcotic treatment program provider that is exclusively billing the state or the county for services rendered to persons subject to Section 1210.1 or 3063.1 of the Penal Code or Section 14021.52 shall submit accurate and complete performance reports
 for the previous state fiscal year by November 1 following the end of that fiscal year. That provider shall estimate its budgets using the uniform state daily reimbursement rate. The format and content of the performance reports shall be mutually agreed to by the department, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, and representatives of the treatment provider.

(i) Any contract entered into pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(j) Annually, the department shall publish procedures for contracting for Drug Medi-Cal services with certified providers and for claiming payments, including
 procedures and specifications for electronic data submission for services rendered.

(k) If the department commences or concludes a preliminary criminal investigation of a certified provider, the department shall promptly notify each county that currently contracts with the provider for Drug Medi-Cal services that a preliminary criminal investigation has commenced or concluded.

(1) Notice of the commencement and conclusion of a preliminary criminal investigation shall be made to the county behavioral health director or their equivalent.

(2) Communication between the department and a county specific to the commencement or conclusion of a preliminary criminal investigation shall be confidential and shall not be subject to
 any disclosure request, including, but not limited to, the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code), the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), requests pursuant to a subpoena, or for any other public purpose, including, but not limited to, court testimony.

(3) Information shared by the department with a county on a preliminary criminal investigation shall be maintained in a manner to ensure protection of the confidentiality of the criminal investigation.

(4) The information provided to a county pursuant to this section shall only include the provider name, national provider identifier number, address, and the
 notice that an investigation has commenced or concluded.

(5) A county shall not take any adverse action against a provider based solely upon the preliminary criminal investigation information disclosed to the county.

(6) In the event of a preliminary criminal investigation of a county owned or operated program, the department has the option, but is not required, to notify the county when the department commences or concludes a preliminary criminal investigation.

(7) This section does not limit the voluntary or otherwise legally mandated or contractually mandated sharing of information between the department and a county of information on an audit or investigation of a Drug Medi-Cal provider.
